Alabama, session 2026rs, SB202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-51-231.01 of the Code of Alabama
1975, is amended to read as follows:
"§45-51-231.01
(a)(1) Any Sheriff of Montgomery County who has served
two consecutive full terms shall receive an additional expense
allowance of twenty seventy thousand dollars ($20,000)
($70,000) per year, payable in equal monthly installments from
the general fund of the county. This expense allowance shall
be in addition to all other compensation or benefits granted
to the sheriff and may be treated as compensation for
retirement contributions.
(2) This subsection shall be void at the earlier of the
end of the term of the sheriff serving on August 1, 2023, or
on upon a vacancy in the office of sheriff for any reason.
(b) Effective beginning the next term of office of the
Sheriff of Montgomery County, and thereafter, any sheriff who
has served two or more consecutive full terms as sheriff,
shall receive an annual salary in the amount of one hundred
seventy-five thousand dollars ($175,000) two hundred
twenty-five thousand dollars ($225,000). The salary shall be
paid from the general fund of the county.
Page 1

paid from the general fund of the county.
SB202 Enrolled
Section 2. This act shall become effective on the first
day of the first month following its passage.
Page 2

day of the first month following its passage.
SB202 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB202
Senate 12-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 03-Mar-26




By: Senator Hatcher
Page 3